District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.18

Remedy.

The Rental Housing Commission, Rent Administrator, or any affected housing provider or tenant may commence a civil action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to enforce any rule or decision issued under this chapter.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 218, 32 DCR 3089
1981 Ed., § 45-2528.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3502.01.